sv: Typ av personanpassning: Anpassat val av berlock; Anpassat bildtryck; Graverad text; Initial/monogram; Ingen personanpassning; Fotoinlägg; Tryckt text; Övrigt
hr-HR: vrsta personalizacije: Prilagođeni odabir privjesaka; Prilagođeni ispis slike; Ugravirani tekst; Inicijal/monogram; Bez personalizacije; Umetanje fotografije; Tiskani tekst; Ostalo
zh-TW: 個人化類型: 自訂吊飾選擇; 自訂圖片列印; 刻字; 首字母縮寫/花體字母; 無個人化設計; 放入相片; 印刷文字; 其他
tr: Kişiselleştirme türü: Özel sallantılı süs seçimi; Özel görsel baskısı; Oyma metin; Baş harf/monogram; Kişiselleştirme yok; Fotoğraf eki; Baskılı metin; Diğer
zh-CN: 个性化定制类型: 自定义吊坠选择; 自定义图片印制; 刻字; 首字母/字母组合; 无个性化; 嵌入照片; 印制文字; 其他
pl: Typ personalizacji: Wybór niestandardowych zawieszek; Niestandardowy nadruk grafiki; Grawerowany tekst; Inicjał / monogram; Brak personalizacji; Wkładka na zdjęcie; Wydrukowany tekst; Inny
nb: Tilpasningstype: Egendefinert valg av anheng; Egendefinert bildetrykk; Inngravert tekst; Initial/monogram; Ingen personlig tilpasning; Bildeinnsats; Trykt tekst; Annet
bg-BG: Тип персонализация: Избор на персонализиран талисман; Печат на персонализирано изображение; Гравиран текст; Инициал/монограм; Без персонализиране; Поставяне на снимка; Отпечатан текст; Друго
fr: Type de personnalisation: Sélection de breloques personnalisées; Impression d’image personnalisée; Texte gravé; Initiale/monogramme; Sans personnalisation; Insert photo; Texte imprimé; Autre
ro-RO: Tip de personalizare: Selecție de talismane personalizate; Imprimare cu imagine personalizată; Text gravat; Inițială/monogramă; Fără personalizare; Inserție foto; Text imprimat; Altele
lt-LT: Personalizavimo tipas: Pasirinktinis pakabukas; Pasirinktinio vaizdo spauda; Išgraviruotas tekstas; Inicialas / monograma; Be asmeninio pritaikymo; Įdedama nuotrauka; Atspausdintas tekstas; Kita
pt-BR: Personalização tipo: Seleção de pingente personalizado; Impressão de imagem personalizada; Texto gravado; Inicial/monograma; Sem personalização; Inserção de foto; Texto impresso; Outros
it: Tipo di personalizzazione: Selezione ciondoli personalizzata; Stampa immagine personalizzata; Testo inciso; Iniziale/monogramma; Nessuna personalizzazione; Inserto per foto; Testo stampato; Altro
fi: Mukautustyyppi: Mukautettu helavalikoima; Mukautettu kuvapainatus; Kaiverrettu teksti; Nimikirjain/monogrammi; Ei personointia; Valokuvalisäke; Painettu teksti; Muu
el: Τύπος εξατομίκευσης: Επιλογή προσαρμοσμένου διακοσμητικού στοιχείου; Εκτύπωση προσαρμοσμένης εικόνας; Χαραγμένο κείμενο; Αρχικό γράμμα/μονόγραμμα; Χωρίς εξατομίκευση; Ένθετη φωτογραφία; Εκτυπωμένο κείμενο; Άλλο
de: Personalisierungsart: Individuelle Anhängerauswahl; Individueller Bilddruck; Gravierter Text; Initiale/Monogramm; Keine Personalisierung; Fotoeinsatz; Gedruckter Text; Andere
ru: Тип персонализации: Индивидуальный подбор шармов; Печать индивидуального изображения; Гравировка текста; Инициалы / монограмма; Без персонализации; Вставка фото; Печатный текст; Другое
cs: Typ personalizace: Vlastní výběr přívěsků; Vlastní potisk obrázku; Gravírovaný text; Iniciála/monogram; Bez personalizace; Vložení fotky; Tištěný text; Ostatní
nl: Personalisatie type: Aangepaste bedelselectie; Aangepaste afbeeldingsprint; Gegraveerde tekst; Initiaal/monogram; Geen personalisatie; Foto-inzetstuk; Gedrukte tekst; Overige
da: Tilpasningstype: Valg af tilpasset vedhæng; Tryk af tilpasset billede; Indgraveret tekst; Initial/monogram; Ingen personlig tilpasning; Indsættelse af foto; Trykt tekst; Andet
sk-SK: Typ personalizácie: Vlastný výber príveskov; Potlač vlastného obrázka; Vygravírovaný text; Iniciály/monogram; Bez personalizácie; Vloženie fotografie; Vytlačený text; Iné
pt-PT: Tipo de personalização: Seleção de pendente personalizado; Impressão de imagem personalizada; Texto gravado; Inicial/monograma; Sem personalização; Inserção de fotografia; Texto impresso; Outra
sl-SI: Vrsta personalizacije: Izbira obeskov po meri; Tisk slike po meri; Vgravirano besedilo; Začetnica/monogram; Brez prilagojenosti; Vstavek s fotografijo; Natisnjeno besedilo; Drugo
en: Personalization type: Custom charm selection; Custom image print; Engraved text; Initial/monogram; No personalization; Photo insert; Printed text; Other
es: Tipo de personalización: Selección de dijes personalizados; Impresión de imagen personalizada; Texto grabado; Inicial/monograma; Sin personalización; Inserto de foto; Texto impreso; Otro
ko: 맞춤 설정 유형: 맞춤형 참 선택; 맞춤형 이미지 인쇄; 각인 텍스트; 이니셜/모노그램; 개인화 없음; 사진 삽입; 인쇄 텍스트; 기타
vi: Loại cá nhân hóa: Chọn charm tùy chỉnh; In hình ảnh tùy chỉnh; Khắc chữ; Chữ cái đầu/chữ lồng; Không cá nhân hóa; Lồng ảnh; In chữ; Khác
th: จะให้เหมาะกับแต่ละบุคคลประเภท: เลือกชาร์มแบบกำหนดเอง; พิมพ์ภาพแบบกำหนดเอง; ข้อความสลัก; ชื่อย่อ/โมโนแกรม; ไม่มีการปรับแต่งเฉพาะบุคคล; ใส่รูปภาพ; ข้อความพิมพ์; อื่นๆ
hu: Személyre szabás típusa: Egyéni charm választás; Egyedi képnyomtatás; Gravírozott szöveg; Kezdőbetű/Monogram; Nincs személyre szabás; Fényképbetét; Nyomtatott szöveg; Egyéb
ja: パーソナライゼーションタイプ: カスタムチャーム選択; カスタム画像プリント; テキスト刻印; イニシャル/モノグラム; パーソナライズなし; 写真挿入; テキストプリント; その他